Florida, session 2026, SB484.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 67 68 Section 1.âEffective upon becoming a law, section 163.326, 69 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 70 163.326âLarge load customer considerations.â 71 (1)âThe Legislature finds that certain land uses, including 72 facilities with substantial electric or other utility demands, 73 such as data centers and other large load customers as defined 74 in s. 366.043(2), may present unique planning, infrastructure, 75 and compatibility considerations. The Legislature intends that 76 such considerations shall be addressed through local 77 comprehensive planning and land development regulations adopted 78 pursuant to this chapter, including provisions related to 79 infrastructure capacity, land use compatibility, environmental 80 impacts, and the efficient provision of public facilities and 81 services. 82 (2)âLocal governments shall maintain the authority to 83 exercise the powers and responsibilities for comprehensive 84 planning and land development regulation granted by law with 85 respect to large load customers. A large load customer may not 86 be considered an electric substation for the purposes of s. 87 163.3208. 88 Section 2.âParagraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (1) 89 of section 288.075, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 90 paragraphs (b), (c), and (d), respectively, paragraph (a) of 91 subsection (2) is amended, and a new paragraph (a) is added to 92 subsection (1) of that section, to read: 93 288.075âConfidentiality of records.â 94 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 95 (a)ââData centerâ has the same meaning as in s. 373.203. 96 (2)âPLANS, INTENTIONS, AND INTERESTS.â 97 (a)1.âIf a private corporation, partnership, or person 98 requests in writing before an economic incentive agreement is 99 signed that an economic development agency maintain the 100 confidentiality of information concerning plans, intentions, or 101 interests of such private corporation, partnership, or person to 102 locate, relocate, or expand any of its business activities in 103 this state, the information is confidential and exempt from s. 104 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution for 12 105 months after the date an economic development agency receives a 106 request for confidentiality or until the information is 107 otherwise disclosed, whichever occurs first. 108 2.âAn economic development agency may extend the period of 109 confidentiality specified in subparagraph 1. for up to an 110 additional 12 months upon written request from the private 111 corporation, partnership, or person who originally requested 112 confidentiality under this section and upon a finding by the 113 economic development agency that such private corporation, 114 partnership, or person is still actively considering locating, 115 relocating, or expanding its business activities in this state. 116 Such a request for an extension in the period of confidentiality 117 must be received prior to the expiration of any confidentiality 118 originally provided under subparagraph 1. This subparagraph does 119 not apply to information described in subparagraph 1. relating 120 to data centers. 121 122 If a final project order for a signed economic development 123 agreement is issued, then the information will remain 124 confidential and exempt for 180 days after the final project 125 order is issued, until a date specified in the final project 126 order, or until the information is otherwise disclosed, 127 whichever occurs first. However, such period of confidentiality 128 may not extend beyond the period of confidentiality established 129 in subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. 130 Section 3.âSection 366.043, Florida Statutes, is created to 131 read: 132 366.043âLarge load tariffs for public electric utilities.â 133 (1)âThe Legislature finds that the provision of safe and 134 reliable electric services, provided at fair, just, and 135 reasonable rates, is essential to the welfare of the ratepayers 136 of this state. The Legislature further finds that when one class 137 of electric service customer requires uniquely large electrical 138 loads at a single location, it imposes a disproportionate risk 139 on the other ratepayers of this state and makes it necessary for 140 the commission to develop and enforce rate structures and other 141 policies for such customers which ensure such risk is mitigated 142 as much as possible and prevent shifting the costs of serving 143 large load customers to the general body of ratepayers. 144 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 145 (a)ââControlled byâ means having the power to direct or 146 cause the direction of the management or policies of a company, 147 whether through ownership of securities, by contract, or 148 otherwise. A person or an entity that directly or indirectly has 149 the right to vote 25 percent or more of the voting interests of 150 the company or that is entitled to 25 percent or more of its 151 profits is presumed to control the entity. 152 (b)ââForeign country of concernâ has the same meaning as in 153 s. 692.201. 154 (c)ââForeign entityâ means an entity that is: 155 1.âOwned or controlled by the government of a foreign 156 country of concern; or 157 2.âA partnership, an association, a corporation, an 158 organization, or other combination of persons organized under 159 the laws of or having its principal place of business in a 160 foreign country of concern, or a subsidiary of such entity. 161 (d)ââLarge load customerâ means a customer with an 162 anticipated monthly peak load of 50 megawatts or more, 163 calculated as the highest average load over a 15-minute interval 164 at a single location. The term does not include a load 165 aggregated across multiple locations owned by the same customer. 166 However, the term includes all customers or other entities that 167 have entered into a colocation or similar agreement at a single 168 location that otherwise meets the anticipated monthly peak load 169 provided in this paragraph. 170 (e)ââPublic utilityâ has the same meaning as in s. 366.02, 171 except that the term does not include a gas utility. 172 (3)âThe following minimum tariff and service requirements 173 for large load customers are required in public utility tariffs: 174 (a)âThe minimum tariff and service requirements must 175 reasonably ensure that each large load customer bears its own 176 full cost of service and that such cost is not shifted to the 177 general body of ratepayers. Such cost of service includes, but 178 is not limited to, connection, incremental transmission, 179 incremental generation, and other infrastructure costs; 180 operations and maintenance expenses; and any other costs 181 required to serve a large load customer. The risk of nonpayment 182 of such costs may not be borne by the general body of 183 ratepayers. 184 (b)âThe minimum tariff and service requirements must 185 include provisions reasonably designed to prevent a public 186 utility from providing electric service to a customer that would 187 otherwise qualify as a large load customer if that customer is a 188 foreign entity. 189 (4)âA customer may not separate an electrical load at a 190 single location into multiple smaller connections to avoid being 191 classified as a large load customer. 192 (5)âTo effectuate the requirements of subsection (3), the 193 commission may approve public utility tariffs that include 194 utility industry-accepted ratemaking and other financial tools, 195 including, but not limited to, the following: 196 (a)âContributions in aid of construction or other required 197 customer infrastructure investments that may be returned, in 198 whole or in part, to such customers over time. 199 (b)âDemand charges, including minimum demand charges. 200 (c)âIncremental generation charges. 201 (d)âFinancial guarantees. 202 (e)âMinimum load factors. 203 (f)âTake-or-pay provisions or similar provisions requiring 204 payment for contracted capacity, regardless of a large load 205 customerâs actual electricity use or demand. 206 (g)âMinimum period of service contract requirements, 207 including early termination fees or other fees for violation of 208 such contracts. 209 (6)âAny tariff, contractual provision, service requirement, 210 or other public utility policy relating to large load customers 211 may not prevent or otherwise hinder the curtailment or 212 interruption of electric service to a large load customer where 213 such curtailment or interruption is intended to ensure grid 214 stability, reduce the likelihood or breadth of wider service 215 outages, or ensure public safety during an emergency or other 216 exceptional circumstance. 217 (7)âA public utility may not knowingly provide electric 218 service to a customer that would otherwise qualify as a large 219 load customer if that customer is a foreign entity. 220 (8)âNo later than October 1, 2026, each public utility 221 shall file, for commission approval, a tariff that complies with 222 this section. 223 Section 4.âEffective upon becoming a law, subsections (3) 224 and (4) of section 373.203, Florida Statutes, are redesignated 225 as subsections (5) and (6), respectively, and new subsections 226 (3) and (4) are added to that section, to read: 227 373.203âDefinitions.â 228 (3)ââData centerâ means a facility that primarily contains 229 electronic equipment used to process, store, and transmit 230 digital information, which may be: 231 (a)âA free-standing structure; or 232 (b)âA facility within a larger structure which uses 233 environmental control equipment to maintain the proper 234 conditions for the operation of electronic equipment. 235 (4)ââLarge-scale data centerâ means a single location, with 236 a data center on site, that has an anticipated monthly peak load 237 of 50 megawatts or more, calculated as the highest average load 238 over a 15-minute interval. The term does not include a load 239 aggregated across multiple locations owned by the same customer. 240 However, the term includes all customers or other entities that 241 have entered into a colocation or similar agreement at a single 242 location that otherwise meets the anticipated monthly peak load 243 provided in this subsection. 244 Section 5.âSection 373.262, Florida Statutes, is created to 245 read: 246 373.262âLarge-scale data center permitting.â 247 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that the 248 development and operation of large-scale data centers in this 249 state be managed under a permitting framework that ensures this 250 stateâs water resources are used in the public interest, in a 251 manner that is not harmful to the water resources of this state, 252 and consistent with local government zoning regulations and 253 comprehensive plans. 254 (2)âConsistent with other provisions of this part, the 255 governing board of a water management district or the department 256 may not issue a permit to a large-scale data center applicant 257 for an allocation of water if the proposed use of the water is 258 harmful to the water resources of the area or is prohibited by 259 the applicable local government zoning regulations and 260 comprehensive plan. A permit shall be issued to a large-scale 261 data center applicant for an allocation of water if the 262 applicant establishes that the proposed use of water: 263 (a)âIs a reasonable-beneficial use as defined in s. 264 373.019; 265 (b)âWill not interfere with any presently existing legal 266 use of water; and 267 (c)âIs consistent with the public interest. 268 (3)âThe governing board or the department shall require the 269 use of reclaimed water in lieu of all or a portion of a proposed 270 use of surface water or groundwater by a large-scale data center 271 applicant when: 272 (a)âA suitable reclaimed water supply source is available 273 and permitted; 274 (b)âReclaimed water distribution or supply lines are 275 available at the property boundary in sufficient capacity and 276 quality to serve the applicantâs needs; 277 (c)âThe applicant is capable of accessing the reclaimed 278 water source through distribution or supply lines; 279 (d)âUse of reclaimed water is environmentally, 280 economically, and technically feasible; and 281 (e)âUse of reclaimed water would not conflict with the 282 requirements contained in the applicantâs surface water 283 discharge permit, if applicable. 284 (4)(a)âIn addition to the requirements of s. 373.229, all 285 permit applications made under this part requesting an 286 allocation of at least an average daily flow of 100,000 gallons 287 of water per day by a large-scale data center must contain: 288 1.âAll sources and amounts of water and losses of water 289 used for cooling, industrial and treatment processes, personal 290 or sanitary needs of employees, and landscape irrigation; and 291 2.âA water conservation plan that, at a minimum, 292 incorporates recycling cooling water before discharge or 293 disposal, implementation of a leak detection and repair program, 294 use of water efficient fixtures, and implementation of an 295 employee awareness and education program concerning water 296 conservation. 297 (b)âNotwithstanding s. 373.229(4), the governing board or 298 the department may not approve a permit application made under 299 this part by a large-scale data center without a hearing. 300 Section 6.âSubsection (2) of section 373.239, Florida 301 Statutes, is amended to read: 302 373.239âModification and renewal of permit terms.â 303 (2)âIf the proposed modification involves water use of 304 100,000 gallons or more per day or is proposed by a large-scale 305 data center as defined in s. 373.203, the application shall be 306 treated under the provisions of s. 373.229 in the same manner as 307 the initial permit application. Otherwise, the governing board 308 or the department may at its discretion approve the proposed 309 modification without a hearing, provided the permittee 310 establishes that: 311 (a)âA change in conditions has resulted in the water 312 allowed under the permit becoming inadequate for the permitteeâs 313 need, or 314 (b)âThe proposed modification would result in a more 315 efficient utilization of water than is possible under the 316 existing permit. 317 Section 7.âThe Office of Program Policy Analysis and 318 Government Accountability (OPPAGA) shall contract for an 319 independent, interdisciplinary study of policy considerations 320 related to the construction and operation of large-scale data 321 centers, including, but not limited to, state, regional, or 322 local economic development and tax revenue impacts; use of land, 323 water, and other natural resources; energy use and related cost 324 and rate impacts; and public health and safety related impacts. 325 OPPAGA may contract with one or more nonpartisan academic or 326 nonprofit research organizations with policy and scientific 327 expertise in relevant fields of study. The study must identify 328 any issues unique to the construction and operation of large 329 scale data centers in this state. The study must also include 330 recommendations on facility siting and mitigation measures that 331 should be considered to reduce any potential negative impacts. 332 OPPAGA shall submit the study to the Governor, the President of 333 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by 334 July 1, 2027. 335 Section 8.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 336 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 337 becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.